Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 3.1. Mail Registration.

§ 24.2-416.1.
Voter registration by mail.

A person may apply to register to vote by mail by completing and returning a mail voter registration application form in the manner and time provided by law.

History.

1996, cc. 72, 73; 2003, c. 1015; 2020, cc. 718, 1149, 1151, 1201; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 471.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “52 U.S.C. § 20302 et seq.” was substituted for “42 U.S.C. § 1973ff-1 et seq.” and “52 U.S.C. § 20102(b)(2)(B)(ii)” was substituted for “42 U.S.C. § 1973ee-1(b)(2)(B)(ii)” to conform to the editorial reclassification of Title 52, U.S.C., effective September 1, 2014.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “institution of higher education” was substituted for “institution of higher learning” in subsection B to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, rewrote subsection B, which formerly read: “Any person, who registers to vote by mail pursuant to this article and who has not previously voted in the county or city in which he registers to vote, shall be required to vote in person. However, this requirement to vote in person shall not apply to a person who (i) is entitled to vote by absentee ballot under the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act (42 U.S.C. § 1973ff-1 et seq.); (ii) is provided the right to vote otherwise than in person under § 3 (b) (2) (B) (ii) of the Voting Accessibility for the Elderly and Handicapped Act (42 U.S.C. § 1973ee-1 (b) (2) (B) (ii)); (iii) is entitled to vote otherwise than in person under other federal law; or (iv) is a full-time student in an institution of higher learning.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 718, in the last sentence, inserted a new clause (iii) and renumbered former clauses (iii) through (v) as clauses (iv) through (vi).

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1149, 1151, and 1201 are identical, and deleted “who is otherwise qualified to vote absentee under §

24.2-700

” at the end of clause (ii) of subsection B.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 471, effective July 1, 2021, deleted the subsection A designation; and deleted subsection B, which read “B. Any person, who applies to register to vote by mail pursuant to this article and who has not previously voted in the county or city in which he registers to vote, shall be required to vote in person, either at the polls on election day or in-person absentee. However, this requirement to vote in person shall not apply to a person so long as he (i) is entitled to vote by absentee ballot under the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act (52 U.S.C. § 20302 et seq.); (ii) is provided the right to vote otherwise than in person under § 3(b)(2)(B)(ii) of the Voting Accessibility for the Elderly and Handicapped Act (52 U.S.C. § 20102(b)(2)(B)(ii)), including any disabled voter and any voter age 65 or older; (iii) is entitled to vote by absentee ballot by reason of his confinement while awaiting trial or for having been convicted of a misdemeanor; (iv) is entitled to vote otherwise than in person under other federal law; (v) is a full-time student in an institution of higher education; or (vi) requests to vote an absentee ballot by mail for presidential and vice-presidential elections only, for any reason, as entitled by federal law.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Electronic signatures. —

Although no law requires the acceptance of mailed voter registration applications with electronic signatures, the State Board of Elections is not precluded from directing that general registrars accept such applications, and the State Board, in its discretion, may do so. The State Board also has discretionary authority to establish criteria to preserve the security of confidential voter information and to ensure the authenticity and validity of electronic signatures. See opinion of Attorney General to Messrs. James M. Hinshaw, Daniel H. Haworth, W. Donald Brown, City of Norfolk Electoral Board, 13-111, 2014 Va. AG LEXIS 47 (9/26/14).

§ 24.2-416.2.
Mail voter registration application forms.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

24.2-418

and

24.2-418.1

, the national mail voter registration application form promulgated by the Election Assistance Commission pursuant to the National Voter Registration Act (52 U.S.C. § 20501 et seq.) shall be accepted for the registration of otherwise qualified voters to vote in federal, state, and local elections. In addition to the national form promulgated by the Election Assistance Commission, the State Board of Elections shall design and distribute a state mail voter registration application form. Such state form shall include the eligibility requirements for registration as provided in this title, shall provide for a receipt for the applicant pursuant to §

24.2-418.1

, and shall require each applicant to provide the information required subject to felony penalties for making false statements pursuant to §

24.2-1016

.

Each state form shall be accompanied by the following statement featured prominently in boldface capital letters: “WARNING: INTENTIONALLY MAKING A MATERIALLY FALSE STATEMENT ON THIS FORM CONSTITUTES THE CRIME OF ELECTION FRAUD, WHICH IS PUNISHABLE UNDER VIRGINIA LAW AS A FELONY. VIOLATORS MAY BE SENTENCED TO UP TO 10 YEARS IN PRISON, OR UP TO 12 MONTHS IN JAIL AND/OR FINED UP TO $2,500.”

History.

1996, cc. 72, 73; 2008, c. 865; 2015, c. 740.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 865, cl. 2 provides: “That applications printed prior to the effective date of this act may be used until supplies are exhausted.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “52 U.S.C. § 20501 et seq.” was substituted for “42 U.S.C. § 1973gg et seq.” to conform to the editorial reclassification of Title 52, U.S.C., effective September 1, 2014.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 865, in the first paragraph, substituted “§§

24.2-418

and

24.2-418

.1” for “§ 24.2-418” in the first sentence and inserted “shall provide for a receipt for the applicant pursuant to §

24.2-418.1

” in the last sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 740 substituted “Election Assistance Commission” for “Federal Election Commission” wherever it appears.

§ 24.2-416.3.
Distribution of mail voter registration application forms.

Subject to the conditions set forth in §

24.2-416.6

, the Department of Elections shall make available to any individual or group a reasonable number of mail voter registration application forms.

The Department shall provide a reasonable number of mail voter registration application forms to each agent of the Department of Wildlife Resources authorized to sell hunting or fishing licenses in Virginia. The Department of Wildlife Resources shall assist the Department by providing a list of its agents appointed to sell hunting and fishing licenses in Virginia and by instructing its agents to make the mail voter registration application forms available to persons purchasing hunting or fishing licenses.

The Department shall provide a reasonable number of mail voter registration application forms to (i) each public institution of higher education, as that term is defined in §

23.1-100

; (ii) each nonprofit private institution of higher education, as that term is defined in §

23.1-100

, that is eligible to participate in the Tuition Assistance Grant Program pursuant to Article 5 (§

23.1-628

et seq.) of Chapter 6 of Title 23.1; and (iii) any other entity authorized to issue bonds pursuant to Chapter 11 (§

23.1-1100

et seq.) of Title 23.1. The State Council of Higher Education for Virginia shall assist the Department by providing a list of such institutions and by requesting those institutions to make the mail voter registration application forms available to students.

History.

1996, cc. 72, 73; 2011, cc. 197, 225; 2013, c. 465; 2015, c. 740; 2020, cc. 921, 958.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 197 and 225 are identical, and designated the existing provisions of the section as subsection A; and added subsection B.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 465 added “Subject to the conditions set forth in §

24.2-416.6

” at the beginning of subsection A, and made a related change.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 740 substituted “Department” for “State Board” wherever it appears.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 921 added subsection C.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958, in subsection B, substituted “Department of Wildlife Resources” for “Department of Game and Inland Fisheries” once each in both the first and last sentences.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Election Law and Government,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 119 (2011).

§ 24.2-416.4.
Return of mail voter registration applications.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

24.2-416

, a mail voter registration application returned through the United States Postal Service shall be deemed to have been made as of the date of the postmark affixed to such application by the United States Postal Service. If no such postmark is affixed or if the postmark affixed by the United States Postal Service is illegible or bears no date, such application shall be deemed to have been timely if received through the United States mail no later than five days following the time for the closing of the registration books pursuant to §

24.2-416

.

In any other case, a completed mail voter registration application shall be deemed timely if received by any general registrar or any person authorized to receive voter registration applications pursuant to §

24.2-415.1

by 5:00 p.m. on the final day of registration provided for in §

24.2-414

.

History.

1996, cc. 72, 73; 2013, c. 680.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 680 substituted “5:00 p.m. on the final day of registration provided for in §

24.2-414

” for “the deadline provided for in §

24.2-416

for closing the registration books” at the end of subsection B.

§ 24.2-416.5.
Social security number or parts thereof not to be disclosed.

Any person assisting an applicant with the completion or return of a mail voter registration application shall not copy, disclose or make any use of the social security number, or any part thereof, of the applicant except as authorized by law for official use.

History.

1996, cc. 72, 73; 2007, c. 318.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 318 inserted “or any part thereof” near the end of the section.

§ 24.2-416.6.
Registration by and instructions for voter registration drives; compensation prohibitions.

Whenever the Department of Elections, local electoral board, or general registrar’s office furnishes individuals or groups multiple copies of the voter registration application, it shall provide accompanying instructions that contain a copy and explanation of §

24.2-1002.01

and the penalty for destruction of, or failure to mail or deliver, voter registration applications that have been signed. Any like instructions furnished to the public by whatever means shall contain a copy and explanation of §

24.2-1002.01

and the penalty for destruction of, or failure to mail or deliver, voter registration applications. When obtaining 25 or more voter registration applications, such individuals or groups shall be required to register with and provide to the Department, local electoral board, or general registrar’s office such information as required by the Department. Such individuals or agents representing a group shall be required to receive training as approved by the State Board and sign a sworn affidavit on a form prescribed by the State Board attesting that such individuals or organizations will abide by all Virginia laws and rules regarding the registration of voters.

No individual or group shall compensate its volunteers or employees on the basis of the number of completed voter registration applications the volunteer or employee collects. No volunteer or employee of an individual or group shall accept compensation based on the number of completed voter registration applications he collects.

History.

2005, cc. 339, 412; 2013, c. 465; 2015, c. 740; 2017, c. 336.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 465 added the last two sentences.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 740 substituted “Department of Elections” for “State Board” in the first sentence; and substituted “Department” for “State Board” both times it appears in the third sentence.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 336 added the second paragraph.